Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7495.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 17-25-7.2 of the General Laws in Chapter 17-25 entitled "Rhode
Island Campaign Contributions and Expenditures Reporting" is hereby amended to read as follows:
17-25-7.2. Personal use of campaign funds prohibited.
(a) The personal use by any elected public office holder or by any candidate for public
office, as defined in § 17-25-3, of campaign funds contributed after April 29, 1992, is prohibited.
For the purposes of this section, “personal use” is defined as any use other than expenditures related
to gaining or holding public office and for which the candidate for public office or elected public
official would be required to treat the amount of the expenditure as gross income under § 61 of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. § 61, or any subsequent corresponding Internal Revenue
Code of the United States, as from time to time amended.
(b) Expenditures that are specifically prohibited under this chapter include:
(1) Any residential or household items, supplies, or expenditures, including mortgage, rent,
or utility payments for any part of any personal residence of a candidate or officeholder or a member
of the candidate’s or officeholder’s family;
(2) Mortgage, rent, or utility payments for any part of any nonresidential property that is
owned by a candidate or officeholder or a member of a candidate’s or officeholder’s family and
used for campaign purposes, to the extent the payments exceed the fair-market value of the property
usage;

(3) Funeral, cremation, or burial expenses, including any expenses related to deaths within
a candidate’s or officeholder’s family;
(4) Clothing, other than items of de minimis value that are used in the campaign;
(5) Tuition payments;
(6) Dues, fees, or gratuities at a country club, health club, recreational facility or other
nonpolitical organization, unless they are part of a specific fundraising event that takes place on the
organization’s premises;
(7) Salary payments to a member of a candidate’s family, unless the family member is
providing bona fide services to the campaign. If a family member provides bona fide services to a
campaign, any salary payments in excess of the fair-market value of the services provided is
personal use;
(8) Admission to a sporting event, concert, theater, or other form of entertainment, unless
part of a specific campaign or officeholder activity;
(9) Payment of any fines, fees, or penalties assessed pursuant to this chapter.
(c) Any expense that results from campaign or officeholder activity is permitted use of
campaign funds. Such expenditures may include:
(1) The defrayal of ordinary and necessary expenses of a candidate or officeholder;
(2) Office expenses and equipment, provided the expenditures and the use of the equipment
can be directly attributable to the campaign or the officeholder’s duties and responsibilities;
(3) Donations to charitable organizations, provided the candidate or officeholder does not
personally benefit from the donation or receive compensation from the recipient organization;
(4) Travel expenses for an officeholder, provided that the travel is undertaken as an
ordinary and necessary expense of seeking, holding, or maintaining public office, or seeking,
holding, or maintaining a position within the legislature or other publicly elected body. If a
candidate or officeholder uses campaign funds to pay expenses associated with travel that involves
both personal activities and campaign or officeholder activities, the incremental expenses that result
from the personal activities are personal use, unless the person(s) benefiting from this use
reimburse(s) the campaign account within thirty (30) days for the amount of the incremental
expenses;
(5) Gifts of nominal value and donations of a nominal amount made on a special occasion
such as a holiday, graduation, marriage, retirement, or death, unless made to a member of the
candidate’s or officeholder’s family;
(6) Meal expenses that are incurred as part of a campaign activity or as a part of a function
that is related to the candidate’s or officeholder’s responsibilities, including meals between and
LC004553/SUB A - Page 2 of 5

among candidates and/or officeholders that are incurred as an ordinary and necessary expense of
seeking, holding, or maintaining public office, or seeking, holding, or maintaining a position within
the legislature or other publicly elected body;
(7) Food and beverages that are purchased as part of a campaign or officeholder activity;
(8) Communication access expenses that are incurred as part of a campaign activity and
operation to ensure that deaf and hard-of-hearing citizens are fully participating, are volunteers,
and/or are otherwise maintaining a position with the campaign committee. Examples of
communication access expenses include, but are not limited to, the following: captioning on
television advertisements; video clips; sign language interpreters; computer-aided real-time
(CART) services; and assistive listening devices;
(9) Childcare expenses that are incurred as a result of campaign activity or the
officeholder’s responsibilities.; and
(10) Home or office security expenses which may include:
(i) The purchase, installation, maintenance, and upgrade of physical security equipment
including, surveillance cameras, door access controls, locks, alarms, motion detectors; and
(ii) Monitoring and other services, including maintenance, directly associated with such
physical security equipment.
(d) Any campaign funds not used to pay for the expenses of gaining or holding public office
may:
(1) Be maintained in a campaign account(s);
(2) Be donated to a candidate for public office, to a political organization, or to a political
action committee, subject to the limitation on contributions in § 17-25-10.1;
(3) Be transferred, in whole or in part, into a newly established political action committee
or ballot question advocate;
(4) Be donated to a tax-exempt charitable organization as that term is used in § 501(c)(3)
of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. § 501, or any subsequent, corresponding internal
revenue code of the United States as from time to time amended;
(5) Be donated to the state of Rhode Island; or
(6) Be returned to the donor; provided, however:
(e) Any funds remaining in a campaign account(s) of a candidate or officeholder, or former
candidate or former officeholder, who dies, after repayment of loans and accounts payable, shall
be disposed, in accordance with the instructions in writing, on a form prescribed by the board of
elections, which funds may:
(1) Be donated to a candidate for public office, to a political organization, or to a political
LC004553/SUB A - Page 3 of 5

action committee, subject to the limitation on contributions in § 17-25-10.1;
(2) Be transferred, in whole or in part, into a newly established political action committee
or ballot question advocate;
(3) Be donated to a tax-exempt charitable organization as that term is used in § 501(c)(3)
of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. § 501, or any subsequent, corresponding internal
revenue code of the United States as from time to time amended; or
(4) Be returned to the donor.
(5) The candidate’s or officeholder’s, or former candidate’s or former officeholder’s,
campaign account(s) shall be dissolved by the board of elections;
(6) Any penalties assessed to the candidate or officeholder, or former candidate or former
officeholder, that are outstanding at the time of their death shall be waived by the board of elections.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004553/SUB A
========
LC004553/SUB A - Page 4 of 5